Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-56-101. Authority of municipality or county — Establishment of management entity — Transit authorities.

Any municipality or county incorporated or existing under the laws of Tennessee, or any combination of any municipality or county incorporated or existing under the laws of Tennessee, intrastate or interstate, has authority to establish, acquire, purchase, construct, extend, improve, maintain, operate or franchise a public transportation system, including the acquisition of any type of vehicles necessary, car barns, terminals, garages, repair shops, buildings, lands, accessory apparatus, rights-of-way and easements, and all other appurtenances necessary, usual or proper to such a public transportation system for hire of passengers in the municipalities, counties, and the metropolitan area of the municipalities and counties, including the right to extend such service beyond county lines in the state, and upon compliance with the laws of other states, into foreign states. Such a system for the transportation of passengers may be under the direct jurisdiction, control and management of such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or any such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, is hereby authorized to create a transit authority or other operating or management entity by ordinance or resolution, for the purpose of managing such a public transportation system, and to prescribe the qualifications and eligibility of members of such a transit authority, their terms of office, powers and duties.

Regardless of any private acts to the contrary, the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, may dissolve any existing transit authority under such private act, and establish by ordinance a transit authority as authorized in this part with the right of the legislative body of the municipality or county to approve the budget and set the rates of fare. The municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, shall have the right pursuant to the approval of the governing body of the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, to contract with a private management firm to operate the transit authority, or to employ its own personnel for the purpose of operating the transit authority.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 1; 1971, ch. 160, § 5; 1973, ch. 246, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3801.

Cross-References. Gasoline tax for local transportation funding, title 67, ch. 3, part 10.

Passenger transportation services, title 7, ch. 51, part 10.

Attorney General Opinions. Union rights of county department of education's custodial employees, OAG 98-0168, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 168 (8/27/98).

Public access to board members' names, addresses and phone numbers, OAG 99-011, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/25/99).

7-56-102. Powers and authority of municipality, county or transit authority.

Any such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it under this part, has the power and authority to establish, acquire, purchase, construct, extend, improve, maintain, operate or franchise a public transportation system, including the acquisition of any type of vehicles necessary, car barns, terminals, garages, repair shops, buildings, lands, accessory apparatus, rights-of-way and easements, and all other appurtenances necessary, usual or proper to such a public transportation system for hire of passengers. The municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created under this part, has the power to make any and all contracts, including franchises, with any persons, partnerships, firms or corporations, public or private, necessary and incident to carry out this purpose. Such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it has final authority to make a schedule of rates, fares and tolls for transportation services. The municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, has the power and authority to promulgate and enforce such reasonable rules and regulations governing the operation of a public transportation system as may be reasonably necessary. Any municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, additionally has the power to vest in a transit authority created by it full power and authority to license and regulate all forms of public transportation, including, but not limited to, taxicabs, airport limousines, and all other local carriers of passengers for hire. The transit authority, when so authorized, shall fix rates of fares for persons and baggage, routes, and all other services, and has final authority to issue or deny licenses, and to revoke or suspend for cause licenses previously issued.

This part shall not be construed as allowing a municipality, county, metropolitan government, or combination of municipality, county, and metropolitan government, to regulate any motor vehicle engaged primarily in the hauling of fifteen (15) or fewer passengers to and from their regular places of employment, taxicabs and airport limousines excepted, or to regulate the organizers, sponsors, or promoters of motor vehicles engaged primarily in the hauling of passengers to and from their regular places of employment; provided, however, that regulation by the appropriate government shall be permitted if the motor vehicles excluded from regulation, and the organizers, sponsors, and promoters of such vehicles are specifically defined and regulated as a class separate and distinct from other existing common carriers and contract carriers. This subsection (b) shall not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government.

Any municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, intrastate or interstate, or a transit authority created under this part has the power and authority to make fair and equitable arrangements for the protection of employees of existing public transportation systems for hire of passengers and their personal baggage in any of the municipalities, counties and the metropolitan area of municipalities and counties. Such protections shall include, but not be limited to, such provisions as may be necessary for:

The preservation of rights, privileges, and benefits, including continuation of pension rights and benefits, under existing collective bargaining agreements or otherwise;

The continuation of collective bargaining rights;

The protection of individual employees against a worsening of their positions with respect to their employment, to the extent provided by § 13(c) of the former Urban Mass Transportation Act (former 49 U.S.C. § 5333(b));

Assurances of employment to employees of acquired mass transportation systems and priority of reemployment of employees terminated or laid off; and

Paid training or retraining programs.

Such protections shall be specified by the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or transit authority, in any contract or lease for the acquisition or operation of any such public transportation system.

The municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created under this part, has the power and authority to bargain collectively with labor organizations representing employees and may enter into agreements with such organizations relative to wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, health benefits, pensions and retirement allowances of such employees.

In the case of any labor dispute involving such employees where collective bargaining does not result in a settlement, the same shall be submitted at the written request of either party to final and binding arbitration, pursuant to the provisions of any agreement entered into so providing, or in the absence of such provisions, with the written consent of both parties to an arbitration board composed of three (3) persons, one (1) appointed by the employer, one (1) appointed by the labor organization representing the employees, and the third member to be agreed upon by the employer and the labor organization, or, if no such third member is mutually acceptable, selected from a list of five (5) persons to be furnished by the American Arbitration Association at the request of either party, by alternately striking one (1) name until only one (1) name remains. The determination of the majority of the board of arbitration thus established shall be final and binding on all matters in dispute.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no local government or any transit authority created by any local government shall construct, maintain or operate any bus rapid transit system using a separate lane, or other separate right-of-way, dedicated to the use of such bus rapid transit system on any state highway or state highway right-of-way unless the project to construct, maintain or operate such bus rapid transit system on the state highway or state highway right-of-way is approved by the governing body of the local government and by the commissioner of transportation. Prior to approval of the project, the commissioner of transportation shall provide written notice of any such proposed project to the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives, the chair of the transportation and safety committee of the senate, and the chair of the transportation committee of the house of representatives. In addition, any bus rapid transit system using a separate lane, or other separate right-of-way, dedicated to the use of such bus rapid transit system on any state highway or state highway right-of-way shall be subject to the approval of the general assembly in the annual appropriations act if any state agency proposes to assist in funding the project with state or federal-aid funds; or, in the absence of any such proposed funding, the project shall be subject to approval by the general assembly as evidenced by the passage of a joint resolution originating in either house.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 2; 1971, ch. 160, § 1; 1976, ch. 823, §§ 1, 4; T.C.A., § 6-3802; Acts 2014, ch. 998, § 1.

Cross-References. “Strike” defined and prohibited, §7-56-109.

Collateral References.

Liability of municipality for tort in construction or operation of municipally owned railroad or street railway. 31 A.L.R. 1306.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances providing for arbitration of labor disputes involving public employees. 68 A.L.R.3d 885.

7-56-103. Federal and state aid — Contracts to operate — Employment of personnel.

Any such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, has the right to make any and all agreements with or applications to any person, firm, federal or state agency, municipality, or public or private corporation, relating to the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of all or any part of a public transportation system, and contracts for loans, grants or other financial assistance from any state or federal agency. Such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, is expressly granted the right to contract with any person, partnership or corporation, to manage and operate the transit system and to employ the necessary personnel under the direction and supervision of the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it. Any such contracts made by the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, shall be entered into and executed in such manner as may be prescribed by the charter of the municipality, or the general laws of the state.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-3803.

7-56-104. Bonds or notes.

Any municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds or municipal notes, or a combination of revenue bonds and municipal notes, for the creation, purchase or establishment of a public transportation system, to such extent and in such manner as may now or hereafter be authorized by any applicable private or public act or general law of the state, including, but not limited to, the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-3804; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 34.

7-56-105. Interlocal and intergovernmental cooperation — Joint agreements.

Any municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, has the power to enter into such agreements with other municipalities and counties within the state for the joint establishment, purchase and operation of public transportation systems in a metropolitan area. Such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or a transit authority created by it, or a combination of municipalities, counties, or other political subdivisions, likewise has the authority to enter into agreements with other states and the counties and municipalities of other states, by interstate compact, or by agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 9.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-3805.

7-56-106. Eminent domain — Injunction.

Any municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, pursuant to this part, is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn, in the name of such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, any or all of the existing transportation systems, franchises and properties of any local public carrier, and any lands, easements or rights-of-way, either on, under or above the ground, for any and all purposes in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, improvement or maintenance of such transportation system. Title to any such property so condemned shall be taken in the name of the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, and such entity is empowered, immediately upon the filing of a petition for condemnation, to enter upon and take possession of the property described in the petition; provided, that a resolution of the governing body of the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, shall provide that reasonable compensation for the property taken will be a proper charge against, and paid out of the general fund of the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, or the funds derived from the sale of general obligation or revenue bonds, or any combination of general obligation and revenue bonds, issued for the purpose of financing the acquisition or creation of a transportation system. No bond shall be required to be given in any such condemnation suit. Writs of injunction may be sought and obtained without the necessity of posting a bond, against any and all persons interfering in any way with the municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, its officers, agents or servants, in taking possession of, operating and using such property for the purposes for which it is condemned. Any such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, has all the powers granted in title 29, chapter 16, including the right to condemn personal or intangible property devoted to public transportation use.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 6; 1971, ch. 160, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-3806.

7-56-107. Subsidy of public or private transportation companies.

Any municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, incorporated or existing under the laws of Tennessee, additionally has the power and authority to pay unto public or private transportation companies for the local carriage of passengers a reasonable subsidy of their operation, the amount of the subsidy to be wholly in the discretion of the governing body of any such municipality, county, or combination of municipality and county, to ensure continued operation of a public transportation system in any such municipality, county or intrastate or interstate metropolitan area.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 7; 1970, ch. 519, § 1; 1971, ch. 160, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-3807.

7-56-108. Part deemed part of municipal charter.

This part shall form a part of the charters of all incorporated municipalities in the state and shall be authority for any of the counties of Tennessee to provide public transportation or to join with any municipality or combination of municipalities, either in this state or in other states, for the purpose of providing such public transportation.

Acts 1970, ch. 515, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-3808.

7-56-109. “Strike” defined — Prohibited practice.

It is a prohibited practice and evidence of bad faith to engage in a strike.

As used in this section, “strike” means the failure with others to report for duty, the willful absence from one's position, the stoppage of work, or the abstinence in whole or in part from the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, and without the lawful approval of one's superior, or in any manner interfering with the operation of any public agency or public employer, for the purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing the recognition of any employee organization or a change in the conditions or compensation or the rights, privileges, or obligations of employment.

Acts 1971, ch. 160, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3809.

Cross-References. Arbitration of labor disputes mandatory and binding, §7-56-102.